Massachusetts, session 194th, H537.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 59C the
following section:-
Section 59C½. (a)(1) A parent advisory council on special education established in
section 3 of chapter 71B, an English learner parent advisory council established in section 6A of
chapter 71A and a district parent advisory council established in said section 6A of said chapter
71A shall serve as advisory councils to the school committee. Each parent advisory council shall
provide a biannual presentation of their work pursuant to said enabling sections in the school
district to the school committee.
(2) The school committee shall be responsible to ensure funding for training of school
council members established in section 59C of chapter 71 including, but not limited to, relevant
of 2

local governance, leadership training and Massachusetts Association of School Committees, Inc.
training offered by the school district. The superintendent shall provide a manual written by
employees of the school district on school council governance for the training of school council
members.
(b) The school council shall assess the needs of each school by reviewing the federal
annual state report card under 20 U.S.C. § 6311(h) at the earliest possible date after publication.
(c) The school council shall provide complete progress reports on current goals at the
middle and end of school year in time to be available for school budget development and for
future school year planning.
(d) The school council shall complete an annual evaluation and rating of the school
council’s performance as a group. The evaluation will be distributed in April to the principal and
school council chairperson and completed by June 1. A copy of said evaluation shall be provided
to the school committee.
(e) The department shall establish rules and regulations that are necessary to implement
this section.
of 2